Hawaii statutes.
§634-34 Service on boat operators. The
operation, navigation, use, or maintenance by any person, whether a resident or
nonresident of the State, of any boat, ship, barge, or other watercraft in the
navigable waters of the State shall subject the person to the jurisdiction of
the courts of this State in any action or proceeding against the person growing
out of any accident, collision, or claim for damages in which the person and
the boat, ship, barge, or other watercraft may be involved in the navigable waters.
The operation, navigation, use, or maintenance is deemed a signification of the
person's agreement that any summons against the person which is served is of
the same legal force and validity as if served upon the person personally
within this State, whether the person is a nonresident of this State or at the
time a cause of action arises is a resident of this State but subsequently
becomes a nonresident of this State. Service of the summons is to be made as
provided by section 634-36, if the defendant cannot be found in the State.

This section shall not be construed as
repealing or amending any other provision of law relating to the service of
process nor as establishing an exclusive method of service of process in cases
to which this section may apply. [L 1965, c 172, §1; Supp, §230-33.5; HRS
§634-70; am L 1972, c 89, §2A(m); ren HRS §634-34; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L
1983, c 124, §17; am L 1984, c 209, §3; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next